Missouri, session 2026, HB3457.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 197, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 197.181, to read as follows:
197.181. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as "Maddie's Law: The
Rare Pediatric Disease Care and Protocol Protection Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Care plan", a patient-specific electronic document that may include
diagnoses, baseline clinical status, medications and allergies, medical devices, emergency
treatment recommendations, treating providers, and communication needs and that is
developed by the primary physician providing care to the patient;
(2) "Department", the department of health and senior services;
(3) "Emergency department", an emergency department in a hospital licensed
under this chapter;
(4) "Medically complex pediatric patient", a person under eighteen years of age
who has one or more chronic medical conditions expected to last at least twelve months
and who requires multiple medication updates, medical technology, or care coordination
across multiple providers.
3. (1) Each hospital that operates an emergency department in this state may
implement, within its existing electronic health record system, a clearly visible electronic
alert or flag for a medically complex pediatric patient.
(2) The alert shall:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3457 2
(a) Appear in a manner that is immediately identifiable to emergency
department personnel on the patient tracking screen or within the patient's electronic
chart;
(b) Provide rapid, one-click access to the patient's care plan, if available; and
(c) Function in a manner that does not delay triage or treatment.
4. A hospital shall be considered in compliance with this section if the hospital
utilizes existing alert, flagging, or patient notification functionality within its current
electronic health record system.
5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a hospital to:
(1) Purchase a new electronic health record system;
(2) Develop a separate technology platform; or
(3) Create a new full-time position.
6. A parent or legal guardian of a medically complex pediatric patient may
request that the patient's care plan be sent by the patient's licensed health care provider
to the hospital for inclusion in the hospital's electronic health record and alert system.
7. Any approved care plan for a medically complex pediatric patient shall be
entered into the system under the direction of a licensed health care provider at the
hospital where the child may receive emergency care.
8. Participation in the alert system shall be voluntary and shall require the
consent of the parent or legal guardian of the medically complex pediatric patient. A
care plan for a medically complex pediatric patient shall not be considered approved
and placed in the alert system unless the primary physician of the patient confirms the
care plan.
9. All information maintained under this section shall comply with applicable
state and federal privacy laws, including the federal Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act (HIPAA).
10. Any hospital or health care provider acting in good-faith reliance on a care
plan accessed in accordance with this section shall not be subject to additional civil
liability solely for such reliance.
11. The department shall administer the provisions of this section within existing
appropriations.
12. The department may issue model guidelines to assist hospitals in
implementation of the requirements of this section. Such guidelines shall be advisory
and shall not require formal rulemaking unless necessary.
13. Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(1) Establish a state registry;
(2) Require the creation of a state database; or

HCS HB 3457 3
(3) Require the department to collect or store patient-specific medical
information.
✔